Louisiana, session 2026, HB379.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:425(B)(5) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§425. Commissioners
* * *
B. Qualifications and classifications.
* * *
(5) A person who is at least seventeen years of age, under the age of
eighteen, and is not a qualified voter but is otherwise qualified to serve as a
commissioner pursuant to this Subsection may be selected to serve as a
commissioner in any precinct of the ward where he may register to vote pursuant to
R.S. 18:101(A), provided that the person is enrolled in the eleventh or twelfth grade
of any Louisiana public high school or state-approved nonpublic high school, is
participating at the eleventh or twelfth grade level in a home study program approved
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 379 ENROLLED
by the State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education, has received a diploma
from any Louisiana public high school or state-approved nonpublic high school, has
received a diploma for completion of a home study program approved by the State
Board of Elementary and Secondary Education, or has been issued a high school
equivalency diploma after successfully completing the test of General Educational
Development.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.